Illinois, session 104th, HB5383.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the DUI 5Treatment Court Act. 6    Section 5. Purposes. The General Assembly recognizes that 7individuals who operate motor vehicles while under the 8influence of alcohol or any other drug or intoxicating 9compound pose a serious public health threat. The General 10Assembly also recognizes that research indicates that the 11majority of people arrested for driving under the influence 12will not reoffend, but that some individuals arrested for DUI 13will continue to drive impaired and will receive multiple DUI 14arrests. The General Assembly recognizes that, for this group 15of drivers, DUI courts, which are based on the problem-solving 16court model and which apply the Ten Guiding Principles for DWI 17Courts promulgated by the National Center for DWI Courts have 18proven to be an effective countermeasure to reduce recidivism. 19It is the intent of the General Assembly to create specialized 20DUI courts that follow problem-solving court principles and 21the Ten Guiding Principles for DWI Courts promulgated by the 22National Center for DWI Courts, in accordance with 23evidence-based practices and the Illinois Supreme Court   HB5383- 2 -LRB104 19584 RLC 33032 b1Problem-Solving Court Standards. 2    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:3    "Certification" means the process by which a 4problem-solving court obtains approval from the Supreme Court 5to operate in accordance with the Problem-Solving Court 6Standards.7    "DUI program", "DUI court", or "program" means a specially 8designated court, court calendar, or docket facilitating 9intensive therapeutic treatment to monitor and assist 10participants with substance use disorder in making positive 11lifestyle changes and reducing the rate of recidivism. DUI 12programs are nonadversarial in nature and bring together 13substance use disorder professionals, local social programs, 14and monitoring in accordance with the nationally recommended 1510 guiding principles of DUI courts and the Problem-Solving 16Court Standards. Common features of a DUI court program 17include, but are not limited to, a designated judge and staff; 18specialized intake and screening procedures including use of a 19validated DUI risk assessment tool; coordinated treatment 20procedures administered by a trained, multidisciplinary 21professional team; close evaluation of participants, including 22continued assessments and modification of the court 23requirements and use of sanctions, incentives, and therapeutic 24adjustments to address behavior; frequent judicial interaction 25with participants; less formal court process and procedures;   HB5383- 3 -LRB104 19584 RLC 33032 b1voluntary participation; and a low treatment staff-to-client 2ratio.3    "DUI court professional" means a member of the DUI court 4team, including, but not limited to, a judge, prosecutor, 5defense attorney, probation officer, coordinator, or treatment 6provider.7    "Peer recovery coach" means a mentor assigned to a 8defendant during participation in a substance treatment court 9program who has been trained by the court, a service provider 10used by the court for substance use disorder or mental health 11treatment, a local service provider with an established peer 12recovery coach or mentor program not otherwise used by the 13court for treatment, or a Certified Recovery Support 14Specialist certified by the Illinois Certification Board. 15    "Peer recovery coach" includes individuals with lived 16experiences of the issues the problem-solving court seeks to 17address, including, but not limited to, substance use 18disorder, mental illness, and co-occurring disorders or 19involvement with the criminal justice system. "Peer recovery 20coach" includes individuals required to guide and mentor the 21participant to successfully complete assigned requirements and 22to facilitate participants' independence for continued success 23once the supports of the court are no longer available to them.24    "Post-adjudicatory DUI court program" means a program that 25allows an individual who has admitted guilt or has been found 26guilty, with the defendant's consent and the approval of the   HB5383- 4 -LRB104 19584 RLC 33032 b1court, to enter a DUI court program as part of the defendant's 2sentence or disposition. All DUI courts shall be 3post-adjudicatory court programs.4    "Problem-Solving Court Standards" means the statewide 5standards adopted by the Supreme Court that set forth the 6minimum requirements for the planning, establishment, 7certification, operation, and evaluation of all 8problem-solving courts in this State. 9    Section 15. Authorization.10    (a) The Chief Judge of each judicial circuit may establish 11a DUI court program in compliance with the Problem-Solving 12Court Standards. At the discretion of the Chief Judge, the DUI 13court program may be operated in one or more counties of the 14circuit and allow defendants from all counties within the 15circuit to participate. DUI court programs must be certified 16by the Illinois Supreme Court.17    (b) Whenever the county boards of 2 or more counties 18within the same judicial circuit determine that a single DUI 19court program would best serve those counties, the county 20board of each such county may adopt a resolution to the effect 21that there shall be a single DUI court program serving those 22counties, and shall provide a copy of the resolution to the 23Chief Judge of the judicial circuit. Upon receipt of such a 24resolution, the Chief Judge may establish or, in the case of an 25existing DUI court program, reorganize a single DUI court   HB5383- 5 -LRB104 19584 RLC 33032 b1program to serve those counties. 2    Section 20. Eligibility. 3    (a) A defendant may be admitted into a DUI court program 4upon the consent of the defendant and with the approval of the 5court only if the person: 6        (1) has been charged with driving under the influence 7    of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound 8    or compounds, or any combination thereof under Section 9    11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code or a similar provision 10    of a local ordinance;11        (2) has been charged with aggravated driving under the 12    influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating 13    compound or compounds, or any combination thereof under 14    subsection (d) of Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle 15    Code, excluding a charge:16            (A) involving a motor vehicle crash resulting in 17        great bodily harm or permanent disability or 18        disfigurement to another when the violation was a 19        proximate cause of the injuries, in violation of 20        subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of 21        Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.22            (B) involving a motor vehicle crash resulting in 23        bodily harm, other than great bodily harm or permanent 24        disability or disfigurement, to another person when 25        the violation was a proximate cause of the bodily harm   HB5383- 6 -LRB104 19584 RLC 33032 b1        and the violation occurred while the person was 2        driving at any speed in a school speed zone at a time 3        when a speed limit of 20 miles per hour was in effect 4        under subsection (a) of Section 11-501 of the Illinois 5        Vehicle Code in violation of subparagraph (E) of 6        paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of Section 11-501 of 7        the Illinois Vehicle Code.8            (C) involving a motor vehicle, snowmobile, 9        all-terrain vehicle, or watercraft crash resulting in 10        the death of another person when the violation was a 11        proximate cause of the death, in violation of 12        subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of 13        Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.14            (D) involving a motor vehicle crash resulting in 15        bodily harm, but not great bodily harm, to the child 16        under the age of 16 being transported by the person 17        when the violation was the proximate cause of the 18        injury, in violation of subparagraph (J) of paragraph 19        (1) of subsection (d) of Section 11-501 of the 20        Illinois Vehicle Code.21    (b) A defendant agrees to be admitted when a written 22consent to participate is provided to the court in open court 23and the defendant acknowledges understanding its contents.24    (c) A defendant shall be excluded from a DUI court program 25if any one of the following applies: 26        (1) The defendant denies his or her use of alcohol or   HB5383- 7 -LRB104 19584 RLC 33032 b1    another drug or having a substance use disorder.2        (2) The defendant does not demonstrate a willingness 3    to participate in a treatment program.4        (3) The defendant has been convicted of a crime of 5    violence within the past 5 years excluding incarceration 6    time, parole, and periods of mandatory supervised release. 7    As used in this paragraph, "crime of violence" means: 8    first degree murder, second degree murder, predatory 9    criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal 10    sexual assault, criminal sexual assault, armed robbery, 11    aggravated arson, arson, aggravated kidnaping, kidnapping, 12    aggravated battery resulting in great bodily harm or 13    permanent disability, aggravated domestic battery 14    resulting in great bodily harm or permanent disability, 15    aggravated criminal sexual abuse by a person in a position 16    of trust or authority over a child, stalking, aggravated 17    stalking, home invasion, aggravated vehicular hijacking, 18    or any offense involving the discharge of a firearm. 19    Section 25. Procedure. 20    (a) A DUI evaluation and risk assessment appropriate for 21problem-solving courts and DUI courts of the defendant shall 22be performed as required by the court's policies and 23procedures prior to the defendant's admission into a DUI 24court. The DUI evaluation shall be conducted in accordance 25with the Department of Human Services' DUI evaluation rules.   HB5383- 8 -LRB104 19584 RLC 33032 b1The DUI evaluation shall include, but is not limited to, 2assessments of the defendant's alcohol use and mental and 3behavioral health needs and the defendant's risk to public 4safety. The DUI evaluation shall be administered by 5individuals approved under the Department of Human Services' 6rules. DUI treatment plans shall be developed in accordance 7with the Problem-Solving Court Standards and in part upon the 8known availability of treatment resources. Any risk assessment 9shall be performed using an assessment tool approved by the 10Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts and as required 11by the court's policies and procedures. An assessment need not 12be ordered if the court finds a valid DUI risk assessment 13related to the present charge pending against the defendant 14has been completed within the previous 60 days.15    (b) The judge shall inform the defendant that if the 16defendant fails to meet the conditions of the DUI court 17program, eligibility to participate in the program may be 18restored, a previously ordered sentence stay may be lifted, or 19the defendant may be sentenced as provided in the Illinois 20Vehicle Code or the Unified Code of Corrections.21    (c) The defendant shall execute a written agreement as to 22his or her participation in the program and shall agree to all 23of the terms and conditions of the program, including, but not 24limited to, the possibility of sanctions or incarceration for 25failing to abide or comply with the terms of the program.26    (d) In addition to any conditions authorized under the   HB5383- 9 -LRB104 19584 RLC 33032 b1Pretrial Services Act and Section 5-6-3 of the Unified Code of 2Corrections, the court may order the participant to complete 3mental health counseling or substance use disorder treatment 4in an outpatient or residential treatment program and may 5order the participant to comply with physicians' 6recommendations regarding medications and all follow-up 7treatment for any mental health diagnosis made by the 8provider. Substance use disorder treatment programs must be 9licensed by the Department of Human Services in accordance 10with the Department of Human Services' substance use 11prevention and recovery rules, or an equivalent standard in 12any other state where the treatment may take place, and use 13evidence-based treatment. 14    (e) The DUI court program shall include a regimen of 15graduated requirements, including fines, fees, costs, 16restitution, individual and group therapy, substance use 17analysis testing, close monitoring by the court, restitution, 18educational or vocational counseling as appropriate, and other 19requirements necessary to fulfill the DUI court program. 20Program phases, therapeutic adjustments, incentives, and 21sanctions, including the use of jail sanctions, shall be 22administered in accordance with evidence-based practices and 23the Problem-Solving Court Standards. A participant's failure 24to pay program fines or fees shall not prevent the participant 25from advancing phases or successfully completing the program. 26DUI court participants may not be required to refrain from   HB5383- 10 -LRB104 19584 RLC 33032 b1using medication-assisted treatment as a term or condition of 2successful completion of the DUI court program.3    (f) Recognizing that individuals struggling with substance 4use disorder and related co-occurring disorders have often 5experienced trauma, DUI court programs may include specialized 6service programs specifically designed to address trauma. 7These specialized services may be offered to individuals 8admitted to the DUI court program. Judicial circuits 9establishing these specialized programs shall partner with 10advocates, survivors, and service providers in the development 11of the programs. Trauma-informed services and programming 12shall be operated in accordance with evidence-based best 13practices as outlined by the Substance Abuse and Mental Health 14Service Administration's National Center for Trauma-Informed 15Care.16    (g) The court may establish a mentorship program that 17provides access and support to program participants by peer 18recovery coaches. Courts shall be responsible to administer 19the mentorship program with the support of mentors and local 20mental health and substance use disorder treatment 21organizations.22    (h) Upon successful completion of the terms and conditions 23of the program, the court may vacate or successfully terminate 24the participant's sentence or otherwise discharge the 25participant from further proceedings against the participant 26in the original prosecution. However, the court may not   HB5383- 11 -LRB104 19584 RLC 33032 b1dismiss the DUI or aggravated DUI charge or vacate the DUI or 2aggravated DUI charge or expunge the associated records. 3    Section 30. DUI risk education. 4    (a) A defendant admitted into a DUI court program shall 5receive DUI risk education. DUI risk education shall provide 6orientation to the defendant regarding the impact of alcohol 7and other drug use on individual behavior and driving skills 8and to allow the defendant to further explore the personal 9ramifications of his or her own alcohol use and abuse. The DUI 10risk education curriculum shall include:11        (1) information on alcohol as a drug; 12        (2) physiological and pharmacological effects of 13    alcohol and other drugs, including their residual 14    impairment on normal levels of driving performance;15        (3) other drugs, legal and illegal, and their effects 16    on driving when used separately or in combination with 17    alcohol, or both;18        (4) alcohol abuse or dependence and the effect on 19    individuals and families;20        (5) blood alcohol concentration level and its effect 21    on driving performance;22        (6) information about Illinois driving under the 23    influence laws and associated penalties;24        (7) factors that influence the formation of patterns 25    of alcohol and drug abuse; and  HB5383- 12 -LRB104 19584 RLC 33032 b1        (8) information about referrals for services that can 2    address any identified problem that may increase the risk 3    for future alcohol or drug related difficulty, or both.4    (b) Risk education courses shall include a minimum of 10 5hours of classroom instruction, divided into at least 4 6sessions held on different days. No session shall exceed 3 7hours in length.8    (c) In order to successfully complete risk education, the 9defendant shall attend each session in its entirety and in 10proper sequence and achieve a score on the post-test of at 11least 75%.12    (d) Upon successful completion, a DUI Risk Education 13Certificate of Completion shall be issued to each defendant. 14The certificate shall be produced by the DUI Service Reporting 15System. All sections of this form shall be complete, and it 16shall be signed by the DUI risk education instructor.17    (e) Audio-visual presentations shall not comprise more 18than 25% of the total class time. 19    (f) No more than 24 participants shall be permitted in any 20one class session.  21    Section 35. Violation; termination; dismissal from 22program. 23    (a) If the court finds from the evidence presented, 24including, but not limited to, the reports or proffers of 25proof from the DUI court professionals, that the participant   HB5383- 13 -LRB104 19584 RLC 33032 b1is not complying with the requirements of the treatment 2program or has otherwise violated the terms and conditions of 3the program, then the court may impose reasonable sanctions 4under the prior written agreement of the participant, 5including, but not limited to, imprisonment or dismissal of 6the participant from the program, and the court may lift a 7previously ordered sentence stay, or the defendant may be 8sentenced as provided in the Illinois Vehicle Code or Unified 9Code of Corrections.10    (b) Based on the evidence presented, the court shall 11determine whether the participant has violated the conditions 12of the program and whether the participant should be dismissed 13from the program or whether, pursuant to the court's policies 14and procedures, some other alternative may be appropriate in 15the interests of the participant and the public.16    (c) A participant who is assigned to a substance use 17disorder treatment program under this Act is not in violation 18of the terms or conditions of the program on the basis of 19participation in medication-assisted treatment under the care 20of a physician licensed in this State to practice medicine in 21all of its branches.22    (d) A participant may voluntarily withdraw from the DUI 23court program in accordance with the DUI court program's 24policies and procedures. Prior to allowing the participant to 25withdraw, the judge shall:26        (1) ensure that the participant has the right to   HB5383- 14 -LRB104 19584 RLC 33032 b1    consult with counsel prior to withdrawal;2        (2) determine in open court that the withdrawal is 3    made voluntarily and knowingly; and 4        (3) admonish the participant in open court as to the 5    consequences, actual or potential, which can result from 6    withdrawal.7    Upon withdrawal, the criminal proceedings may be 8reinstated against the participant or proceedings may be 9initiated under Section 5-6-4 of the Unified Code of 10Corrections for a violation of probation, conditional 11discharge, or supervision hearing.12    (e) No participant may be dismissed from the program 13unless, prior to dismissal, the participant is informed in 14writing:15        (1) of the reason or reasons for the dismissal;16        (2) the evidentiary basis supporting the reason or 17    reasons for the dismissal; and18        (3) that the participant has a right to a hearing at 19    which the participant may present evidence supporting the 20    participant's continuation in the program.21    (f) A participant who has not violated the conditions of 22the program in such a way as to warrant unsuccessful 23dismissal, but who is unable to complete program requirements 24to qualify for a successful discharge, may be terminated from 25the program as a neutral discharge.26    (g) Upon successful completion of the terms and conditions   HB5383- 15 -LRB104 19584 RLC 33032 b1of the program, the court may vacate any or all of the sentence 2or successfully terminate the participant's sentence or 3otherwise discharge the participant from any further 4proceedings against the participant in the original 5prosecution, but the court may not dismiss the DUI or 6aggravated DUI charges or prevent a conviction for DUI or 7aggravated DUI from being entered and reported to the 8Secretary of State. 9    Section 40. Education for judges. A judge assigned to 10preside over a DUI court shall have experience, training, and 11continuing education in related topics, including, but not 12limited to:13        (1) criminal law;14        (2) behavioral health;15        (3) confidentiality;16        (4) ethics;17        (5) evidence-based practices;18        (6) substance use disorder;19        (7) mental illness;20        (8) co-occurring disorders; 21        (9) presiding over various types of problem-solving 22    courts; and23        (10) impaired driving and traffic law. 24    Section 45. Education seminars for DUI court prosecutors.   HB5383- 16 -LRB104 19584 RLC 33032 b1Subject to appropriation, the Office of the State's Attorneys 2Appellate Prosecutor shall conduct mandatory education 3seminars for all DUI court prosecutors throughout the State to 4ensure that the problem-solving court maintains fidelity to 5the problem-solving court model. Topics include, but are not 6limited to, evidence-based screening, assessment and treatment 7practices, target population, substance use disorder, mental 8illness, disability, co-occurring disorders, trauma, 9confidentiality, criminogenic risks and needs, incentives and 10sanctions, court processes, traffic and impaired driving law, 11limited English proficiency, and team dynamics.  12    Section 50. Education seminars for DUI court public 13defenders. Subject to appropriation, the Office of the State 14Appellate Defender shall conduct mandatory education seminars 15for all DUI court public defenders and assistant public 16defenders practicing in DUI courts throughout the State to 17ensure that the problem-solving court maintains fidelity to 18the problem-solving court model. Topics include, but are not 19limited to, evidence-based screening, assessment and treatment 20practices, target population, substance use disorder, mental 21illness, disability, co-occurring disorders, trauma, 22confidentiality, criminogenic risks and needs, incentives and 23sanctions, court processes, traffic and impaired driving law, 24limited English proficiency, and team dynamics.